Vermont, session 2025-2026, H797.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds:
(1) Multiple large-scale studies and government evaluations in the
United States show that implementing an interdisciplinary model of legal
representation for children and families involved in proceedings related to
child abuse or neglect leads to improved outcomes, faster reunification, greater
cost savings, and preservation of child safety and family stability.
(2) Empirical findings show that children spend up to four months less
time in foster care and are reunified with families earlier with the use of such a
model. Annual government cost savings are estimated at $40 million in
reduced foster care days and earlier permanency decisions. Families with
complex needs experience greater stability, lower rates of reinvolvement in the
child welfare system, and more equitable outcomes across racial and ability
lines. Further, these models do not increase subsequent child maltreatment
rates. Cases close more quickly and are more likely to result in kinship
placements, thereby preserving family ties and reducing trauma for children.
(3) Federal policy now allows the use of child welfare funds for support
of interdisciplinary teams for representation. As a result of these findings, in
its 2021 Study of CHINS Case Processing in Vermont, the National Center for
VT LEG #386241 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.797
2026 Page 3 of 9
State Courts recommended that Vermont adopt a high-quality interdisciplinary
legal representation program.
(4) An interdisciplinary legal representation program can benefit from,
and provide critical information to, the Vermont Supreme Court’s Sequential
Intercept Model in its mission of fostering communication across services,
while cataloguing service availability and effectiveness.
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. § 5323 is added to read:
§ 5323. INTERDISCIPLINARY LEGAL REPRESENTATION PROGRAM;
DEFENDER GENERAL’S CITIZENS ADVISORY BOARD
(a) The Defender General shall establish an interdisciplinary legal
representation program for children and families dedicated to prepetition and
postpetition representation and advocacy for children and families involved
with substantiations of abuse and neglect and petitions filed pursuant to this
chapter. The program shall do each of the following:
(1) Work closely with the Department for Children and Families to
leverage federal funding pursuant to Title IV-E of the federal Social Security
Act.
(2) Appoint, compensate, evaluate, and retain attorneys, social workers,
peer advocates, and other staff in a manner that provides for the highest quality
of interdisciplinary representation for children, parents, custodians, or
guardians whose children are, or are at risk of being placed, in the legal
VT LEG #386241 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.797
2026 Page 4 of 9
custody of the Department for Children and Families and who may have
substantiations related to their cases. All employees shall be compensated at
rates comparable to employees of the Attorney General’s office and State’s
Attorneys’ offices.
(3) Utilize attorneys and other staff or contractors in an organized team
approach in each case as determined by client need.
(4) Provide routine mandatory training, supervision, and evaluation
relative to specified performance measures. Regarding employees or agencies
under contract, work shall be supervised by a contract attorney designated by
the Defender General for that purpose to ensure the contractor meets
performance expectations and standards. Agencies under contract shall, at a
minimum, utilize supervision, training, and evaluation processes that are the
same as or similar to those utilized by the Defender General.
(5) Fund contracts involving established nonprofit agencies utilizing a
pass-through funding model.
(6) Develop and continuously approve practice models and standards
based on child welfare best practices and American Bar Association and
National Association of Social Workers guidelines among others. Such
practice models include time spent with clients prior to, during, and following
court and agency appearances.
VT LEG #386241 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.797
2026 Page 5 of 9
(7) Provide zealous representation of all clients.
(8) Ensure that clients are provided with due process and procedural
fairness.
(9) Provide positive outcomes for children and their families, including
decreased time to permanency and swift resolution of cases while engaging
with others in the child protection and child welfare system to achieve those
ends.
(10) Assign cases through the normal assignment process utilized by the
clerk of courts where contract services are utilized.
(11) Establish standards identifying ethically responsible caseloads and
workloads, including load monitoring protocols for all employees and
contractors.
(12) Establish a grievance procedure for clients represented by a staff
attorney or contract attorney.
(13) Participate in Intercept Model regional meetings and information
sharing utilizing the Supreme Court’s Justice for Children Task Force Intercept
Model.
(14) Provide the Department for Children and Families with all data
required by the Department for purposes of compliance with federal funding
requirements.
VT LEG #386241 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.797
2026 Page 6 of 9
(15) Provide the General Assembly with an annual report as to
activities, expenditures, compliance with performance measures, and outcomes
as well as grievances and their resolution. Such annual reports shall be
developed in consultation with the Department for Children and Families.
(b) The Defender General shall establish the Defender General’s Citizens
Advisory Board. The primary role of the Board is to evaluate and improve the
interdisciplinary legal representation system through the review of policies,
practices, procedures, and training to evaluate how effectively the Office of the
Defender General is discharging its responsibilities. The Board shall:
(1) develop bylaws for its operation;
(2) review specific cases, while maintaining strict confidentiality and
not disclosing identifying information, to assess the effectiveness of
interdisciplinary work;
(3) solicit input and comment from the community to assess how the
Office of the Defender General’s current practices affect children and families
throughout Vermont; and
(4) develop and disseminate an annual report for the State and the public
that summarizes the Board’s activities and provides recommendations for
improving the child protection system.
VT LEG #386241 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.797
2026 Page 7 of 9
(c) The Board shall consist of 14 members including:
(1) a member, appointed by the Vermont Law and Graduate School;
(2) a member, appointed by the University of Vermont’s Department of
Social Work;
(3) a member, appointed by the Commissioner for Children and
Families;
(4) a member, appointed by the Secretary of Education;
(5) a member, appointed by the Commissioner of Mental Health;
(6) a parent with lived experience involving the proceedings authorized
by this chapter, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(7) a parent with lived experience involving the proceedings authorized
by this chapter, appointed by the Senate Committee on Committees;
(8) an individual with lived experience as a child involving the
proceedings authorized by this chapter, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(9) an individual with lived experience as a child involving the
proceedings authorized by this chapter, appointed by the Senate Committee on
Committees;
(10) two members, one of whom is involved with the Vermont Juvenile
Court Improvement Program, appointed by the Chief Justice;
VT LEG #386241 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.797
2026 Page 8 of 9
(11) two attorneys with past or current experience representing children
and adults in proceedings authorized by this chapter, appointed by the Vermont
Bar Association; and
(12) one member, appointed by the Governor.
(d) Members of the Board shall:
(1) possess significant experience in the processes of representation of
children, youth, parents, custodians, or guardians in abuse and neglect
proceedings;
(2) possess significant experience with the child welfare system as a
parent, custodian, guardian, or former foster youth; or
(3) demonstrate a commitment to high-quality legal representation or to
working with and advocating for the population served by the Office of the
Defender General.
(e)(1) The Board shall hold its first meeting not later than 30 days after it
has completed the appointment process and shall elect a chair at that meeting.
Thereafter, the Board shall meet at least four times a year, as determined by a
majority of Board members. Meetings shall be held at the call of the Chair or
at the request of four members.
(2) A majority of Board members constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business, and an action by the Board shall not be valid unless
eight or more members concur.
VT LEG #386241 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.797
2026 Page 9 of 9
(3) A representative of the Office of the Defender General shall be
assigned to attend all meetings of the Board.
(4) The Board may assign Board work to one or more subcommittees of
the Board and may invite subject matter experts and members of the public to
participate in meetings.
(5) Board meetings shall be open to the public with the exception of
those parts of meetings that involve the review or discussion of confidential
information determined to be available only to Board members.
(6) The Office of the Defender General shall provide accommodation
for the Board meeting space and general support.
(7) The Citizens Advisory Board shall be fully constituted within 90
days after the passage of this act and shall hold its first meeting within 120
days after passage.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386241 v.1